Hawaii statutes.
§209-30 Terms. (a) No loan shall
include any portion or item of loss covered by a contract of insurance or for
which the applicant receives assistance from any other federal, state, or
county program of disaster relief, and the amount of loans to any one applicant
shall in no case exceed $75,000 for a commercial loan and $35,000 for a
personal loan.

(b) No loan shall be made for a term exceeding
twenty years.

(c) Each loan shall bear simple interest at
the rate of five per cent a year for direct loans and the State's share of
participating loans.

(d) The commencement date for the repayment of
the first installment on principal only for each loan may be deferred for a
period of six months from the date of the loan. [L 1961, c 189, §16; Supp,
§98P-16; HRS §209-30; am L 1976, c 205, §1(2); am L 1990, c 71, §1; am L 1993,
c 334, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next